Vermont, session 2025-2026, S229.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2 V.S.A. chapter 32 is added to read:
CHAPTER 32. LEGISLATIVE COMPENSATION COMMISSION
§ 1021. CREATION OF COMMISSION
(a) Creation. There is created the Legislative Compensation Commission
for the purpose of studying and setting the compensation and expense
reimbursement of members of the General Assembly.
(b) Members.
(1) No individual shall be appointed to the Commission who is a current
member of the General Assembly, a current employee of the General
Assembly, or a registered lobbyist.
(2) The Commission shall be composed of the following members:
(A) three individuals, not all from the same party and one of whom is
a former member of the General Assembly, who shall be appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
(B) three individuals, not all from the same party and one of whom is
a former member of the General Assembly, who shall be appointed by the
Committee on Committees; and
(C) one individual, appointed by the Governor in the Governor’s sole
discretion.
VT LEG #385344 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.229
2026 Page 3 of 10
(3) Members of the Commission shall be appointed on or before
February 1 of the first year of the biennium.
(4) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as for the original
appointments for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(5) The term of each appointment to the Commission shall be two years.
(6) Any member of the Commission shall be eligible for reappointment,
provided that the member is not disqualified pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
(c) Chair. The Speaker shall select the first Chair of the Commission, and
the Committee on Committees shall select the first Vice Chair of the
Commission. The authority to appoint the Chair and Vice Chair shall rotate
biennially between the Speaker and the Committee on Committees.
(d) Meetings.
(1) The Commission shall meet at the call of the Chair, with the first
meeting to be held on or before April 1 of the first year of the biennium.
(2) The Commission shall elect a clerk from among its members and
shall adopt rules of procedure.
(3) A majority of the members of the Commission shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of any business of the Commission.
(4) Any action taken by the Commission shall be by majority vote of the
members present.
VT LEG #385344 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.229
2026 Page 4 of 10
(e) Assistance. The Commission shall have administrative and technical
assistance from the Legislative Office of Human Resources and the Joint Fiscal
Office.
(f) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Commission shall
be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as
permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than eight meetings in the first
year of the Commission and not more than three meetings a year in subsequent
years. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
Legislative Branch.
§ 1022. DUTIES; RECOMMENDATION; PROCEDURE
(a) In its first year, the Legislative Compensation Commission shall
consider and make recommendations on issues involving legislative
compensation and benefits, staffing, administrative support, and the length of
the legislative session, including:
(1) the current composition and benefits offered to members of the
General Assembly, including:
(A) whether current salaries and benefits are sufficient and, if not,
how they should be increased;
(B) the impact of current salaries and benefits on recruiting and
retaining members from diverse backgrounds and life experiences;
VT LEG #385344 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.229
2026 Page 5 of 10
(C) whether members should be offered benefits, in addition to
participation in the State employees’ health plan, such as reimbursement of
child, dependent, and elder care expenses;
(D) whether members should have the option to receive a prorated
salary throughout the calendar year instead of receiving their full salary
amount during the months that the General Assembly is in session;
(E) whether supplemental compensation should be provided to
members who hold leadership positions in addition to the Speaker of the House
and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, including caucus leaders and
committee chairs;
(F) how the salaries, benefits, and compensation structure in the
Vermont General Assembly compare to those of other state legislatures; and
(G) how the salaries, benefits, and compensation structure in the
Vermont General Assembly compare to the mean and median compensation
and benefits of Vermont residents;
(2) whether changes to staffing are necessary, such as increasing the
number of legislative staff in existing staff offices, expanding the types of
legislative staff services available to members, adding caucus staff, and adding
personal staff or providing members with an allowance to hire their own
personal staff;
VT LEG #385344 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.229
2026 Page 6 of 10
(3) how to increase the administrative support available to members to
increase their effectiveness and ability to respond efficiently to the needs of
their constituents; and
(4) whether changes should be made to the length or structure of the
legislative session.
(b) Biennially, the Legislative Compensation Commission shall prepare a
written recommendation establishing the rate of compensation and expense
reimbursement for the Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate, pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 1051, and the rate of compensation and
expense reimbursement for members of the General Assembly, pursuant to 32
V.S.A. § 1052.
(c) The Commission’s recommendations shall be delivered to the General
Assembly on or before December 15 of the first year of each biennium.
(d) The rates of compensation and expense reimbursement recommended
by the Commission shall be the rates for members of the General Assembly
effective the following biennium unless the General Assembly rejects the
recommended rates.
(e) If the General Assembly rejects the rates of compensation and expense
reimbursement recommended by the Commission, the General Assembly may
require the Commission to meet and develop another set of rates of
VT LEG #385344 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.229
2026 Page 7 of 10
compensation and expense reimbursement within 30 calendar days for
submission to the General Assembly.
(f) If the General Assembly rejects the rates of compensation and expense
reimbursement in the Commission’s second recommendation or the session is
adjourned sine die without the General Assembly voting to approve the second
recommendation, then the prevailing rates of compensation and expense
reimbursement shall remain in effect for the following biennium.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 1010 is amended to read:
§ 1010. MEMBERS OF CERTAIN BOARDS
(a) Except for those members serving ex officio or otherwise regularly
employed by the State, the members of the following boards shall be entitled to
receive per diem compensation:
(1) Board of Bar Examiners
* * *
(22) Legislative Compensation Commission
* * *
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 631 is amended to read:
§ 631. GROUP INSURANCE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES; SALARY
DEDUCTIONS FOR INSURANCE, SAVINGS PLANS, AND
CREDIT UNIONS
VT LEG #385344 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.229
2026 Page 8 of 10
(a)(1) The Secretary of Administration may contract on behalf of the State
with any insurance company or nonprofit association doing business in this
State to secure the benefits of franchise or group insurance. The terms of
coverage under the policy shall be determined under section 904 of this title,
but it may include:
(A) life, disability, health, and accident insurance and benefits for
any class or classes of State employees; and
(B) hospital, surgical, and medical benefits for any class or classes of
State employees or for those employees and any class or classes of their
dependents.
(2)(A)(i) As used in this section, the term “employees” includes any
class or classes of elected or appointed officials, State’s Attorneys, sheriffs,
employees of State’s Attorneys’ offices whose compensation is administered
through the State of Vermont payroll system, except contractual and temporary
employees, and deputy sheriffs paid by the State of Vermont pursuant to 24
V.S.A. § 290(b). The term “employees” shall does not include members of the
General Assembly as such, any person rendering service on a retainer or fee
basis, members of boards or commissions, or persons other than employees of
the Vermont Historical Society, the Vermont Film Corporation, the Vermont
State Employees’ Credit Union, Vermont State Employees’ Association, and
the Vermont Council on the Arts, whose compensation for service is not paid
VT LEG #385344 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.229
2026 Page 9 of 10
from the State Treasury, or any elected or appointed official unless the except
as specifically provided pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i). The term
“employees” includes employees of the Vermont Historical Society, the
Vermont State Employees’ Credit Union, the Vermont State Employees’
Association, the Vermont Council on the Arts, and any elected or appointed
official who is actively engaged in and devoting substantially full-time to the
conduct of the business of the official’s public office. The term “employees”
also includes members of the General Assembly as set forth in subdivision (iv)
of this subdivision (a)(2)(A).
* * *
(iv) For purposes of group hospital-surgical-medical expense
insurance, the term “employees” includes members of the General Assembly.
(B)(i) The premiums for extending insurance coverage to employees
shall be paid in full by the Vermont Historical Society, the Vermont Film
Corporation, the Vermont State Employees’ Association, the Vermont State
Employees’ Credit Union, the Vermont Council on the Arts, or their respective
retirees. Nothing herein creates a legal obligation on the part of the State of
Vermont to pay any portion of the premiums required to extend insurance
coverage to this group of employees.
VT LEG #385344 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.229
2026 Page 10 of 10
(ii) Members of the General Assembly shall be required to pay the
same portion of the premium for group hospital-surgical-medical expense
insurance as is required of employees of the Executive Branch.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385344 v.2